New York, session 2025-2026, A11221.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Nassau is hereby authorized to accept 3 from Cong Ahavas Yisrael, Inc., an application for exemption from real 4 property taxes pursuant to section 430 of the real property tax law with 5 respect to the 2026 assessment roll, and all of 2025-2026 school taxes 6 for the parcel conveyed to such organization, with such parcel being 7 located at 539 Arbuckle Avenue, in the village of Cedarhurst, town of 8 Hempstead, otherwise known as Nassau county tax map section 39, block 9 276, lot 95. If accepted, the application shall be reviewed as if it 10 had been received on or before the taxable status dates established for 11 such rolls. 12 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 13 such exemption if such organization had acquired the subject property 14 and filed an application for exemption by the appropriate taxable status 15 date, the assessor, upon approval by the Nassau county legislature, may 16 grant exemption from all taxation and make appropriate corrections to 17 the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such organization 18 therefore shall have paid any tax with respect to the subject 19 rolls, the governing body or tax department may, in its sole discretion, 20 provide for the refund of those taxes paid and cancel any taxes, fines, 21 penalties, interest or tax liens remaining unpaid. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15703-04-6